Utah statutes.
70A-7a-106.   Control of electronic document of title.

(1)  A person has control of an electronic document of title if a system employed for evidencing the transfer of interests in the electronic document reliably establishes that person as the person to which the electronic document was issued or transferred.

(2)  A system satisfies Subsection (1), and a person is considered to have control of an electronic document of title, if the document is created, stored, and assigned in such a manner that:

(a)  a single authoritative copy of the document exists which is unique, identifiable, and, except as otherwise provided in Subsections (2)(d), (e), and (f), unalterable;

(b)  the authoritative copy identifies the person asserting control as:

(i)  the person to which the document was issued; or

(ii)  if the authoritative copy indicates that the document has been transferred, the person to which the document was most recently transferred;

(c)  the authoritative copy is communicated to and maintained by the person asserting control or its designated custodian;

(d)  copies or amendments that add or change an identified assignee of the authoritative copy can be made only with the consent of the person asserting control;

(e)  each copy of the authoritative copy and any copy of a copy is readily identifiable as a copy that is not the authoritative copy; and

(f)  any amendment of the authoritative copy is readily identifiable as authorized or unauthorized.

